Vermont, session 2025-2026, H956.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendment to the charter of the City
of Burlington as set forth in this act. The voters of the City approved the
proposal of amendment on March 3, 2026.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 3 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 3. CITY OF BURLINGTON
* * *
Subchapter 8. General Provisions
* * *
§ 374. OFFICE OF RACIAL EQUITY, INCLUSION, AND BELONGING
(a) The City of Burlington shall form the Office of Racial Equity,
Inclusion, and Belonging (REIB) and establish a Director of Racial Equity,
Inclusion, and Belonging.
(b) The Director of REIB role shall be a permanent position in the City,
selected and hired in accordance with City of Burlington Human Resources
policies and procedures, and shall report directly to the Mayor.
(c) The REIB shall be under the supervision, direction, and control of the
Director, subject to the orders and ordinances of the City Council.
VT LEG #390174 v.1

No. M-9 Page 2 of 3
2026
(d) The Director of REIB shall have all of the powers, duties, and
responsibilities as are provided in the Director position description.
(e) Subject to the orders and ordinances of the City Council, the Mayor and
the Director of REIB shall develop and implement a comprehensive racial
equity, inclusion, and belonging strategy for the City of Burlington.
(f) In furtherance of this work, the Director of REIB shall, subject to the
orders and ordinances of the City Council, have and implement the following
rights, powers, and duties in collaboration with all City departments:
(1) to work on behalf of the City to advance equity and social justice by
championing diversity, inclusion, belonging, and antiracism;
(2) to develop, coordinate, implement, and administer racial equity and
inclusion strategies and projects for the City;
(3) to provide consultation for and recommend to City departments, the
Mayor’s office, and the City Council policy and program changes to better
advance racial equity and inclusion in the City;
(4) to enhance the representation in City government for individuals
who hold underserved community identities, through decision-making bodies,
community engagement initiatives, and policy development processes; and
(5) to coordinate and facilitate constituent engagement in the City that
encourages inclusive spaces for engagement with City government.
* * *
VT LEG #390174 v.1

No. M-9 Page 3 of 3
2026
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 26, 2026
VT LEG #390174 v.1